Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-217.01
Acknowledgment; defective seal; validity.

No deed, mortgage, affidavit, power of attorney or other instrument in writing shall be invalidated because of any defects in the wording of the seal of the notary public attached thereto.

Laws 1945, c. 145, § 12, p. 494.